District of Columbia statutes.
47-2413

Appeals.

Except as provided in § 47-4312, any person, (1) aggrieved by a final determination of tax, or (2) aggrieved by a denial of a claim for refund (other than a refund of tax finally determined under § 47-2410), may, within 6 months from the date of the final determination or from the date of denial of the claim for refund, appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in §§ 47-3303, 47-3304, 47-3306, 47-3307, and 47-3308.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 139, ch. 146, title VI, § 614
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-71, § 2, 28 DCR 5243
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-217, § 4(g), 51 DCR 9126
1981 Ed., § 47-2413.
D.C. Law 15-217 substituted “Except as provided in § 47-4312, any” for “Any”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-513, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8976).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-553, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10359).